Illinois, session 104th, HB755.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Certified Community Behavioral 5Health Clinics Act is amended by changing Section 3-1 as 6follows: 7    (210 ILCS 34/3-1)8    Sec. 3-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Illinois Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics Act.10(Source: P.A. 102-43, eff. 7-6-21.)